Utah statutes.
11-42-103.   Limit on effect of this chapter.

(1)  Nothing in this chapter may be construed to authorize a local entity to provide an improvement or service that the local entity is not otherwise authorized to provide.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a local entity may provide a renewable energy system or energy efficiency upgrade that the local entity finds or determines to be in the public interest.



Amended by Chapter 246, 2013 General Session

